North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-02 General Property Assessment
57-02-20.
Exemption of farm machinery for one year. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 581, § 4.

57-02-21.
Tax exemption of personal property of certain persons with minimum income — Penalty for false statement. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 581, § 4.

57-02-22.
Place of listing in case of doubt. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 558, § 2.

57-02-23.
Number or name of school district to be listed. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1985, ch. 604, § 22.

57-02-24.
Assessors to list coal and minerals. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 544, § 2.

57-02-25.
Procedure in assessment of coal and mineral reserves. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 544, § 2.

57-02-26.
Certain property taxable to lessee or equitable owner — Exception.

Property held under a lease for a term of years, or under a contract for the purchase thereof, belonging to the United States or to the state or a political subdivision thereof, except such lands upon which the state makes payments in lieu of property taxes, or to any religious, scientific, or benevolent society or institution, whether incorporated or unincorporated, or to any railroad corporation whose property is not taxed in the same manner as other property, must be considered, for all purposes of taxation, as the property of the person so holding the same.

Property held under an easement or a lease for a term of years and any improvements upon that property which are used for any purpose relating to discovery, exploration, processing, or transportation of oil or gas must be considered the property of the lessee or easement holder. For the purposes of this subsection, “improvements” does not include property subject to the provisions of chapter 57-06 or property subject to the in lieu of ad valorem tax provisions of chapter 57-51.

Property owned by the state and held under a lease and any structure, fixture, or improvement located on that property is not taxable to the leaseholder if the structure, fixture, or improvement is used primarily for athletic and educational purposes at any state institution of higher education.

Source:

S.L. 1897, ch. 126, § 29; R.C. 1899, § 1206; R.C. 1905, § 1511; C.L. 1913, § 2118; R.C. 1943, § 57-0226; S.L. 1975, ch. 510, § 1; 1985, ch. 610, § 1; 1989, ch. 695, § 1; 1993, ch. 543, § 2; 2003, ch. 48, § 36; 2003, ch. 513, § 1; 2015, ch. 435, § 2, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-02-26.1.
Assessment to lessee of personal property owned by a bank. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 446, § 4.

57-02-27.
Property to be valued at a percentage of assessed value — Classification of property — Limitation on valuation of annexed agricultural lands.

All property subject to taxation based on the value thereof must be valued as follows:

All residential property to be valued at nine percent of assessed value. If any property is used for both residential and nonresidential purposes, the valuation must be prorated accordingly.

All agricultural property to be valued at ten percent of assessed value as determined pursuant to section 57-02-27.2.

All commercial property to be valued at ten percent of assessed value.

All centrally assessed property to be valued at ten percent of assessed value except as provided in section 57-06-14.1.

The resulting amounts must be known as the taxable valuation. In determining the assessed value of real and personal property, except agricultural property, the assessor may not adopt a lower or different standard of value because the same is to serve as a basis of taxation, nor may the assessor adopt as a criterion of value the price at which said property would sell at auction, or at forced sale, or in the aggregate with all the property in the town or district, but the assessor shall value each article or description by itself, and at such sum or price as the assessor believes the same to be fairly worth in money. In assessing any tract or lot of real property, there must be determined the value of the land, exclusive of improvements, and the value of all taxable improvements and structures thereon, and the aggregate value of the property, including all taxable structures and other improvements, excluding the value of crops growing upon cultivated lands. In valuing any real property upon which there is a coal or other mine, or stone or other quarry, the same must be valued at such a price as such property, including the mine or quarry, would sell for at a fair voluntary sale for cash. Agricultural lands within the corporate limits of a city which are not platted constitute agricultural property and must be so classified and valued for ad valorem property tax purposes until such lands are put to another use. Agricultural lands, whether within the corporate limits of a city or not, which were platted and assessed as agricultural property prior to March 30, 1981, must be assessed as agricultural property for ad valorem property tax purposes until put to another use. Such valuation must be uniform with the valuation of adjoining unannexed agricultural land.

Source:

S.L. 1897, ch. 126, § 30; R.C. 1899, § 1207; R.C. 1905, § 1512; C.L. 1913, § 2122; S.L. 1925, ch. 206, § 2; 1925 Supp., § 2122; S.L. 1943, ch. 265, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 57-0227; S.L. 1973, ch. 337, § 4; 1981, ch. 564, § 7; 1981, ch. 805, § 2; 1981, ch. 806, § 4; 1983, ch. 592, § 2; 1983, ch. 593, § 37; 2001, ch. 508, § 1; 2007, ch. 504, § 1.

57-02-27.1.
Property to be valued at true and full value.

All assessors and boards of equalization shall place the values of all items of taxable property at the true and full value of the property except as otherwise specifically provided by law, and the amount of taxes that may be levied on such property must be limited as provided in this chapter. For the purposes of sections 57-02-27, 57-02-27.1, 57-02-27.2, and 57-55-04, the term “true and full value” has the same meaning as provided in subsection 15 of section 57-02-01, except that “true and full value” of agricultural lands must be as determined pursuant to section 57-02-27.2.

The governing body of the city or township may establish valuations that recognize the supply of vacant lots available for sale.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 564, § 1; 2007, ch. 502, § 1; 2009, ch. 530, § 1; 2011, ch. 448, § 1.

57-02-27.2.
Valuation and assessment of agricultural lands.

“True and full value” of agricultural lands must be their agricultural value for the purposes of sections 57-02-27, 57-02-27.1, 57-02-27.2, and 57-55-04. Agricultural value is defined as the “capitalized average annual gross return”, except for inundated agricultural land. The “annual gross return” must be determined from crop share rent, cash rent, or a combination thereof reduced by estimated property taxes and crop marketing expenses incurred by farmland owners renting their lands on a cash or crop share basis.

For purposes of this section, “annual gross return” for cropland used for growing crops other than sugar beets and potatoes means thirty percent of annual gross income produced, “annual gross return” for cropland used for growing sugar beets and potatoes means twenty percent of annual gross income produced, and “annual gross return” for land used for grazing farm animals means twenty-five percent of an amount determined by the department of agribusiness and applied economics of North Dakota state university to represent the annual gross income potential of the land based upon the animal unit carrying capacity of the land.

The “average annual gross return” for each county must be determined as follows:

Total the annual gross returns for the ten years immediately preceding the current year for which data is available and discard the highest and lowest annual gross returns of the ten.

The department of agribusiness and applied economics of North Dakota state university shall establish a base year index of prices paid by farmers using annual statistics on that topic compiled by the national agricultural statistics service for the seven-year period ending in 1995, discarding the highest and lowest years’ indexes, and averaging the remaining five years’ indexes. The department of agribusiness and applied economics shall gather the national agricultural statistics service annual index of prices paid by farmers for the ten years ending with the most recent year used under subdivision a, discard the highest and lowest years’ indexes, average the remaining eight years’ indexes, and divide the resulting amount by the base year index of prices paid by farmers. This amount must be divided into the amount determined under subdivision a.

Divide the figure arrived at in subdivision b by eight.

To find the “capitalized average annual gross return”, the average annual gross return must be capitalized by a rate that is a ten-year average of the gross agribank mortgage rate of interest for North Dakota. The ten-year average must be computed from the twelve years ending with the most recent year used under subdivision a of subsection 3, discarding the highest and lowest years, and the gross agribank mortgage rate of interest for each year must be determined in the manner provided in section 20.2032A-4(e)(1) of the United States treasury department regulations for valuing farm real property for federal estate tax purposes, except that the interest rate may not be adjusted as provided in section 20.2032A-4(e)(2).

The department of agribusiness and applied economics of North Dakota state university shall compute annually an estimate of the average agricultural value per acre [.40 hectare] of agricultural lands on a statewide and on a countywide basis; shall compute the average agricultural value per acre [.40 hectare] for cropland, noncropland, and inundated agricultural land for each county; and shall provide the tax commissioner with this information by December first of each year. Fifty percent of the annual gross income from irrigated cropland must be considered additional expense of production and may not be included in computation of the average agricultural value per acre [.40 hectare] for cropland for the county as determined by the department of agribusiness and applied economics. Before January first of each year, the tax commissioner shall provide to each county director of tax equalization these estimates of agricultural value for each county.

For purposes of this section, “inundated agricultural land” means property classified as agricultural property containing a minimum of ten contiguous acres if the value of the inundated land exceeds ten percent of the average agricultural value of noncropland for the county, which is inundated to an extent making it unsuitable for growing crops or grazing farm animals for two consecutive growing seasons or more, and which produced revenue from any source in the most recent prior year which is less than the county average revenue per acre for noncropland calculated by the department of agribusiness and applied economics of North Dakota state university. Application for classification as inundated agricultural land must be made in writing to the township assessor or county director of tax equalization by March thirty-first of each year. Before all or part of a parcel of property may be classified as inundated agricultural land, the board of county commissioners must approve that classification for that property for the taxable year. The agricultural value of inundated agricultural lands for purposes of this section must be determined by the department of agribusiness and applied economics of North Dakota state university to be ten percent of the average agricultural value of noncropland for the county as determined under this section. Valuation of individual parcels of inundated agricultural land may recognize the probability that the property will be suitable for agricultural production as cropland or for grazing farm animals in the future. Determinations made under this subsection may be appealed through the informal equalization process and formal abatement process provided for in this title.

Before February first of each year, the county director of tax equalization in each county shall provide to all assessors within the county an estimate of the average agricultural value of agricultural lands within each assessment district. The estimate must be based upon the average agricultural value for the county adjusted by the relative values of lands within each assessment district compared to the county average. In determining the relative value of lands for each assessment district compared to the county average, the county director of tax equalization shall use soil type and soil classification data from detailed and general soil surveys.

Each local assessor shall determine the relative value of each assessment parcel within the assessor’s jurisdiction and shall determine the agricultural value of each assessment parcel by adjusting the agricultural value estimate for the assessment district by the relative value of the parcel. Each parcel must then be assessed according to section 57-02-27. If either a local assessor or a township board of equalization develops an agricultural value for the lands in its assessment district differing substantially from the estimate provided by the county director of tax equalization, written evidence to support the change must be provided to the county director of tax equalization. In determining the relative value of each assessment parcel, the local assessor shall apply the following considerations, which are listed in descending order of significance to the assessment determination:

Soil type and soil classification data from detailed or general soil surveys.

The schedule of modifiers that must be used to adjust agricultural property assessments within the county as approved by the state supervisor of assessments under subsection 9.

Actual use of the property for cropland or noncropland purposes by the owner of the parcel.

Before February first of each year, the county director of tax equalization in each county shall provide to all assessors of agricultural property within the county a schedule of modifiers that must be used to adjust agricultural property assessments within the county and directions regarding how those modifiers must be applied by assessors. Before the schedule of modifiers is provided to assessors within the county, the county director of tax equalization shall obtain the approval of the state supervisor of assessments for use of the schedule within the county.

For any county that has not fully implemented use of soil type and soil classification data from detailed or general soil surveys by February first of any taxable year after 2011, the tax commissioner shall direct the state treasurer to withhold five percent of that county’s allocation each quarter from the state aid distribution fund under section 57-39.2-26.1 beginning with the first quarter of 2013, and continuing until the tax commissioner certifies to the state treasurer that that county has fully implemented use of soil type or soil classification data. The amount withheld from the allocation must be deposited into the agricultural land valuation fund. The amount withheld from the allocation must be withheld entirely from the portion of the allocation which may be retained by the county and may not reduce allocations to any political subdivisions within the county.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 564, § 2; 1981, ch. 807, § 1; 1983, ch. 604, § 1; 1985, ch. 611, § 1; 1995, ch. 549, § 1; 1997, ch. 480, § 1; 1997, ch. 481, § 1; 1999, ch. 495, § 1; 1999, ch. 496, § 1; 2001, ch. 509, § 1; 2003, ch. 514, § 1; 2005, ch. 548, § 1; 2007, ch. 501, § 3; 2007, ch. 503, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 524, § 2; 2009, ch. 530, § 2; 2009, ch. 531, § 1; 2011, ch. 449, § 1; 2013, ch. 445, § 1; 2015, ch. 432, § 6, effective August 1, 2015.

Collateral References.

Validity, construction, and effect of state statutes affording preferential property tax treatment to land used for agricultural purposes, 98 A.L.R.3d 916.

Requirement of full-value real property taxation assessments, 42 A.L.R.4th 676.

57-02-27.3.
Taxable valuation of centrally assessed wind turbine electric generators. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 504, § 5.

57-02-28.
Basis for computation of tax.

The value of all property subject to a general property tax to be used in the computation of taxes levied thereon is its taxable valuation as computed pursuant to section 57-02-27.

Source:

S.L. 1917, ch. 59, § 1; 1919, ch. 220, § 1; 1923, ch. 298, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 2122a; I.M. June 29, 1932, § 1; S.L. 1933, p. 493; R.C. 1943, § 57-0228; S.L. 1959, ch. 384, § 1; 1981, ch. 564, § 8; 1981, ch. 565, § 2; 1981, ch. 806, § 5; 1983, ch. 593, § 38.

57-02-29.
Bond and oath of district assessor.

Every person elected or appointed to the office of assessor in an assessor district consisting of unorganized territory, at or before the time of receiving the assessment books, must be bonded for the faithful discharge of the duties of the office, in the state bonding fund or by a corporate surety company authorized to do business in this state, in the penal sum of one thousand dollars. The assessor shall take and subscribe the oath prescribed for civil officers. Failure to be bonded or to take such oath must be deemed a refusal to serve and creates a vacancy in the office.

Source:

S.L. 1897, ch. 126, § 33; R.C. 1899, § 1210; R.C. 1905, § 1516; S.L. 1913, ch. 50, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 2126; R.C. 1943, § 57-0229.

Cross-References.

City assessor, see N.D.C.C. ch. 40-19.

Township assessor, see N.D.C.C. ch. 58-09.

Collateral References.

Civil liability of tax assessor for excessive or improper assessment of real property, 82 A.L.R.2d 1148.

57-02-30.
Assessor may administer oaths.

The assessor may administer oaths to all persons who are required to swear to any statement or return in connection with the assessment and may examine, under oath, any person whom the assessor may believe to have knowledge of the amount or value of the personal property of any person refusing to list or to verify the list of personal property.

Source:

S.L. 1897, ch. 126, § 37; R.C. 1899, § 1214; R.C. 1905, § 1520; C.L. 1913, § 2130; R.C. 1943, § 57-0230.

57-02-31.
Auditor to furnish books to assessors at meeting.

The county auditor annually shall provide the necessary books and blanks at county expense for each assessment district or township in the county. Every year, the county auditor shall enter in the real property assessment book a complete list of all lands or lots subject to taxation. The list must show the name of the owner, if known, the number of acres [hectares], and the lots and parts of lots or blocks included in each description. On or before the second Wednesday in February of each year, following notice by mail from the county auditor, all the assessors in the county shall meet in the county auditor’s office for a conference on their duties as assessors, and the county auditor shall then deliver to each assessor the assessment books and blanks for each assessor’s assessment district. Each assessor must be allowed a sum not to exceed twenty dollars a day, at the discretion of the board of county commissioners, for each day’s attendance at the conference and mileage in the amounts provided in section 11-10-15.

Source:

S.L. 1897, ch. 126, § 31; R.C. 1899, § 1208; S.L. 1901, ch. 27, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 1513; S.L. 1909, ch. 41, § 1; 1911, ch. 291, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 2123; S.L. 1917, ch. 228, § 2; 1925 Supp., § 2123; R.C. 1943, § 57-0231; S.L. 1973, ch. 449, § 2; 1977, ch. 513, § 1; 1983, ch. 598, § 4.

57-02-32.
Auditor to furnish tax list.

The auditor of each county shall make and transmit to the township clerk of each civil township within such county, on the first day of March of each year, a copy of the tax list of such township for the preceding year showing the owner and description of each piece or parcel of land assessed and the valuation thereof.

Source:

S.L. 1905, ch. 175, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 1514; C.L. 1913, § 2124; R.C. 1943, § 57-0232; S.L. 1985, ch. 604, § 3.

57-02-33.
Assessor services for unorganized territory.

Any area not within an organized township or city must be assessed by a certified assessor under the supervision and direction of the county director of tax equalization. The county director of tax equalization may serve as an assessor of property under this section. Every individual performing assessor services under this section is entitled to compensation and mileage and travel expenses determined by the board of county commissioners for the time actually and necessarily employed in assessment of property. The compensation and expenses must be paid from the treasury of the county in which the assessed property is located only upon submission of an itemized statement setting forth the actual time spent in the work of the assessor and mileage traveled, approved by the board of county commissioners.

Source:

S.L. 1897, ch. 126, § 32; 1899, ch. 138, § 1; R.C. 1899, § 1209; S.L. 1903, ch. 36, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 1515; S.L. 1909, ch. 198, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 2125; S.L. 1929, ch. 248, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 57-0233; S.L. 1944 Sp., ch. 13, § 1; 1951, ch. 313, § 1; 1953, ch. 311, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 57-0233; S.L. 1973, ch. 450, § 1; 2015, ch. 433, § 7, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

Cross-References.

Board of equalization, see N.D.C.C. § 57-12-02.

57-02-34.
When and how assessment made.

The assessor shall perform the duties required of the office during the twelve-month period prior to April first in the manner provided in this section. The assessor shall determine both the true and full value as defined by law and the assessed value of each tract or lot of real property listed for taxation, and shall enter those values in separate columns, and the true and full value and assessed value of all improvements and structures taxable thereon in separate columns, opposite such description of property, and in another column shall show the total assessed value of the property by adding the totals of the two previous assessed value columns.

Source:

S.L. 1897, ch. 126, § 34; R.C. 1899, § 1211; R.C. 1905, § 1517; C.L. 1913, § 2127; R.C. 1943, § 57-0234; S.L. 1971, ch. 539, § 1; 1973, ch. 449, § 3; 1981, ch. 565, § 3.

57-02-35.
Sickness or absence of owner. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 598, § 25.

57-02-36.
List given to auditor for persons sick or absent. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 598, § 25.

57-02-37.
Duty of assessor upon failure to obtain assessment — Copy of assessment list to nonresident. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 598, § 25.

57-02-38.
Units of real property for assessment.

In all assessment books and tax lists and in all proceedings for the collection of taxes and proceedings founded thereon, unplatted land and undeveloped land platted before March 30, 1981, not situated within the limits of an incorporated city must be described in subdivisions not exceeding quarter sections. Real property in the platted portion of a city or real property platted on or after March 30, 1981, that is located outside any city and is not agricultural property under the conditions set out in subsection 1 of section 57-02-01, must be assessed separately as to each lot. When a building or structure covers two or more contiguous lots or parts of lots owned by the same person the assessment may not be entered separately as to each lot or part of lot, but the tract upon which the building is located must be described and assessed as one parcel. A block which has not been subdivided may be described, assessed, and taxed in a unit of one block. A failure to comply with the provisions of this section does not impair the validity of taxes.

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 287, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 57-0238; 2009, ch. 530, § 3.

57-02-39.
Irregularities of land to be platted into lots if required.

If any tract or lot of land is divided into irregular shapes which can be described only by metes and bounds, or if any addition or subdivision which already has been platted into blocks and lots and subsequently sold into parts of blocks or lots which can be described only by metes and bounds, or if the courses, distances, and sizes of each lot or fractional lot are not given or marked upon the plat so that the precise location of each lot and fractional lot can be ascertained accurately, surveyed, or laid out, the owner of such tract or tracts, upon the request of the county auditor, shall have such land platted or replatted, as the case may be, into lots or blocks according to deeds on record. If such plat cannot be made without an actual survey of the land, the same must be surveyed and platted and the plat thereof recorded. If the owners of any such tract refuse or neglect to cause such plat and survey, when necessary, to be made and recorded within thirty days after such request, the county surveyor, or some other competent surveyor, upon the request of the county auditor, shall make out such plat from the records of the recorder if practicable, but if it cannot be made from such records, then the surveyor shall make the necessary survey and plat thereof, and the county auditor shall have the same recorded, but no such plat may be recorded until approved by the city engineer of the city affected thereby, and if there is no city engineer, then by the county surveyor. A certificate of the approval of such plat must be made by the officer making the same endorsed on the plat or map. Such certificate also must be recorded and forms a part of the record. When such plat has been duly certified and recorded, any description of the property in accordance with the number and description set forth in such plat must be deemed a good and valid description of the lots or parcels of land so described. No such plat or description may bear the name or number which already has been applied to any plat or description previously made and recorded as a part of any such city. When the owner of such land fails to comply with the provisions of this section, the cost of surveying, platting, and recording must be paid by the county, upon allowance by the board of county commissioners, and the amount thereof must be added to the taxes upon such tracts or lots the ensuing year. Such taxes, when collected, must be credited to the county general fund. The surveyor making such survey or plat is entitled to receive for services in making the same the compensation allowed by law for doing other county surveying or platting, and such fees become a legal charge upon such tracts of land.

Source:

S.L. 1897, ch. 126, § 97; R.C. 1899, § 1280; R.C. 1905, § 1599; S.L. 1911, ch. 287, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 2214; S.L. 1925, ch. 203, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 2214; R.C. 1943, § 57-0239; S.L. 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

57-02-40.
Taxes paramount lien on real estate — Statute of limitations not applicable to personal property taxes.

Taxes upon real property are a perpetual paramount lien thereon against all persons, except the United States and this state.

Taxes upon personal property shall not be affected by any general statute of limitations.

A tax lien includes the principal of the tax, and all costs, penalties, interest, charges, and expenses which by law accrue, attach, or are incurred.

Source:

S.L. 1897, ch. 126, § 72; R.C. 1899, § 1257; R.C. 1905, § 1572; C.L. 1913, § 2186; S.L. 1929, ch. 241, § 5; 1931, ch. 279, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 57-0240.

57-02-41.
Attachment of tax lien and prorating taxes as between vendor and purchaser.

All taxes, as between vendor and purchaser, become a lien on real estate on and after the first day of January following the year for which such taxes were levied. If taxable real property is acquired in any year after the assessment date by an owner in whose hands it will be exempt from taxation, the taxes on it for the portion of the year that it was not exempt, computed to the nearest month, constitute a personal charge against the person from whom it was acquired and all of the provisions of law for payment and collection of personal property taxes are applicable to such prorated taxes.

If exempt real property is acquired in any year after the assessment date by an owner in whose hands it is taxable, it must be assessed as omitted property and the taxes on it for that portion of the year that it is not exempt, computed to the nearest month, are subject to all of the provisions for payment and collection that are applicable to taxes for the same year on other real property.

Source:

S.L. 1897, ch. 126, § 72; R.C. 1899, § 1257; R.C. 1905, § 1572; C.L. 1913, § 2186; S.L. 1929, ch. 241, § 5; 1931, ch. 279, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 57-0241; S.L. 1963, ch. 379, § 1; 1969, ch. 473, § 1; 1975, ch. 511, § 1.

Collateral References.

Property tax: effect of tax-exempt lessor’s reversionary interest on valuation of nonexempt lessee’s interest, 57 A.L.R.4th 950.

57-02-42.
Personal property in transit — Definition — Exemption. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 524, § 2.

57-02-43.
Records. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 524, § 2.

57-02-44.
Reconsignment — Report — Tax. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 524, § 2.

57-02-45.
Criminal penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673; 1975, ch. 524, § 2.

57-02-46.
Civil penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 524, § 2.

57-02-47.
Name of billboard owner.

No person may erect and rent or lease any billboard for advertising purposes upon any land or attached to any building, unless at the time of the erection of such billboard there is attached and firmly affixed thereto a plate or sign containing the name and address of the owner of such billboard, which plate or sign must be kept and maintained thereon at all times.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 377, § 1.

57-02-48.
Failure to designate billboard owner — Penalty.

If the owner of such billboard fails to comply with the provisions of section 57-02-47 within sixty days after the erection of such billboard, such owner is guilty of an infraction.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 377, § 2; 1975, ch. 106, § 594.

Cross-References.

Penalty for infraction, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

57-02-49.
Billboard reports — Contents — Filing — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 524, § 2.

57-02-50.
Agricultural land valuation fund — Deposits — Continuing appropriation.

There is established a special fund in the state treasury to be known as the agricultural land valuation fund. The moneys withheld under subsection 10 of section 57-02-27.2 must be deposited into the agricultural land valuation fund. All moneys deposited in the agricultural land valuation fund are appropriated as a continuing appropriation and must be allocated to the county from which the withholding was made upon certification from the tax commissioner of the implementation of subsection 7 of section 57-02-27.2 by that county.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 449, § 2.

57-02-51.
Notice of township and city equalization meetings to be published — Date of equalization meeting.

Each year the county auditor shall publish in the official county newspaper for two successive weeks, a notice that proceedings for the equalization of assessments will be held by the several local equalization boards. The first publication of the notice may not be earlier than March first and the second publication may not be later than March twentieth. The notice must contain a statement that the proceedings will be held at the regular meeting place of the governing board or other place designated by that board of the township or city, as the case may be. The notice must also contain a statement that each taxpayer has the right to appear before the appropriate board of review or equalization and petition for correction of the taxpayer’s assessment. The equalization proceedings in an organized township and a city must be held within the first fifteen days of April.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 443, § 2; 2019, ch. 476, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

57-02-52.
Notice of county equalization meetings to be published — Date of equalization meeting.

Each year the county auditor shall publish in the official county newspaper for two successive weeks, a notice that proceedings for the equalization of assessments for all real property in the county will be held by the county board of equalization. The first publication of the notice may not be earlier than May first and the second publication may not be later than May twentieth, however, the second notice must be published more than ten days prior to the date of the meeting. The notice must contain the date, time, and location of the meeting. The notice must also contain a statement that each taxpayer has the right to appear before the appropriate board of review or equalization and petition for correction of the taxpayer’s assessment. The county equalization proceedings must be held no later than June tenth.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 443, § 3.

57-02-53.
Assessment increase notice to property owner.

When any assessor has increased the true and full valuation of any lot or tract of land and improvements to an amount that is an increase of three thousand dollars or more and ten percent or more from the amount of the previous year’s assessment, the assessor shall deliver written notice of the amount of increase and the amount of the previous year’s assessment to the property owner at the expense of the assessment district for which the assessor is employed. Delivery of written notice to a property owner under this subdivision must be completed at least fifteen days before the meeting of the local board of equalization.

If written notice by the assessor was not required under subdivision a and action by the township, city, or county board of equalization or order of the state board of equalization has increased the true and full valuation of any lot or tract of land and improvements to an amount that results in a cumulative increase of three thousand dollars or more and ten percent or more from the amount of the previous year’s assessment, written notice of the amount of increase and the amount of the previous year’s assessment must be delivered to the property owner. The written notice under this subdivision must be mailed or delivered at the expense of the township, city, or county that made the assessment increase or at the expense of the township, city, or county that was ordered to make the increase by the state board of equalization. Delivery of written notice to a property owner under this subdivision must be completed within fifteen days after the meeting of the township, city, or county board of equalization that made or ordered the assessment increase and within thirty days after the meeting of the state board of equalization, if the state board of equalization ordered the assessment increase.

The tax commissioner shall prescribe suitable forms for written notices under this subsection. The written notice under subdivision a must show the true and full value of the property, including improvements, that the assessor determined for the current year and for the previous year and must also show the date prescribed by law for the meeting of the local board of equalization of the assessment district in which the property is located and the meeting date of the county board of equalization.

Delivery of written notice under this section must be by personal delivery to the property owner, mail addressed to the property owner at the property owner’s last-known address, or electronic mail to the property owner directed with verification of receipt to an electronic mail address at which the property owner has consented to receive notice.

The form of notice prescribed by the tax commissioner must require a statement to inform the taxpayer that an assessment increase does not mean property taxes on the parcel will increase. The notice may not contain an estimate of a tax increase resulting from the assessment increase.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 437, § 1, effective January 1, 2016; 2017, ch. 411, § 8, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2017.